California statutes. Public Utilities Code
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Personnel [102398. - 102432.]



  ARTICLE 1. Employee Relations [102398. - 102418.]

102398.

As used in this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “District” means the Sacramento Regional Transit District, including all operations and extensions of its transportation system, regardless of modality or vehicle type, and excluding all temporary bus lines.

(b) “Employee organization” means an organization that includes employees of the district that has as one of its primary purposes representing those employees in their relations with the district. “Employee organization” shall also include any person of the organization authorized to act on its behalf.

(c) “Exclusive representative” means an accredited employee organization
 recognized or certified as the exclusive negotiating representative of employees in an appropriate unit within the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 1.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102399.

(a) It is a primary purpose of this chapter to promote the improvement of personnel management and employer-employee relations within the district by providing a uniform basis for recognizing the right of employees to join employee organizations of their own choice, to be represented, to select one employee organization as the exclusive representative of the employees in an appropriate unit, and to afford employees a voice at work.

(b) The Public Employment Relations Board established pursuant to Section 3541 of the Government Code, and the powers and duties of that board, as described in Section 3541.3 of the Government Code, shall have jurisdiction, as appropriate, to enforce this chapter and its existing regulations, shall apply, as
 appropriate, to this chapter. The board shall perform its duties under this section consistent with its regulations and shall have the authority to make additional regulations. The board may also adopt, amend, or repeal all rules and regulations necessary to carry out this article as emergency regulations in accordance with the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code). The adoption, amendment, or repeal of regulations pursuant to this subdivision is conclusively presumed to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, safety, or general welfare within the meaning of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 2.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102400.

Employees shall have the right to self-organization, to form, join, or assist employee organizations, to bargain collectively through representatives of their own choosing, and to engage in other concerted activities for the purpose of collective bargaining or other mutual aid or protection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 3.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102401.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this part, whenever a majority of the employees employed by the district in a unit appropriate for collective bargaining indicate a desire to be represented by an employee organization, the district, upon determining, as provided in Section 102403, that the employee organization represents the employees in the appropriate unit, shall enter into a written contract with the exclusive representative of the employees governing wages, salaries, hours, pensions, and working conditions. If, after a reasonable period of time, representatives of the district and the exclusive representatives of the employees fail to reach agreement either on the terms of a written contract governing wages, hours, pensions, and working conditions or the interpretation or application of the terms of an existing contract, upon the agreement
 of both the district and the representatives of the employees, the dispute may be submitted to an arbitration board and the decision of the majority of the arbitration board shall be final and binding.

The arbitration board shall be composed of two representatives of the district, and two representatives of the employee organization, and they shall endeavor to agree upon the selection of the fifth member. If they are unable to agree, the names of five persons experienced in labor arbitration shall be obtained from the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service. The employee organization and the district shall, alternately, strike a name from the list so supplied, and the name remaining after the employee organization and the district have stricken four names, shall be designated as the arbitrator. The employee organization and the district shall determine by lot who shall first strike from the list. The decision of a majority of the arbitration board shall
 be final and binding upon the parties. The expenses of arbitration shall be borne equally by the parties. Each party shall bear their own costs.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 4.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102402.

(a) A contract or agreement shall not be made, or assumed under this article, with any employee organization, association, or group that denies membership to, or in any manner discriminates against, any employee on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1 of the Government Code. However, the organization may preclude from membership any individual who advocates the overthrow of the government by force or violence.

(b) The district shall not discriminate with regard to employment against any person on any basis listed in subdivision (a) of Section 12940 of the Government Code, as those bases are defined in Sections 12926 and 12926.1
 of the Government Code, except as otherwise provided in Section 12940 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 5.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102403.

If there is a question whether an employee organization represents a majority of employees or whether the proposed unit is or is not appropriate, such matters shall be submitted to the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service for disposition. The California State Mediation and Conciliation Service shall promptly hold a public hearing after due notice to all interested parties and shall thereupon determine the unit appropriate for the purposes of collective bargaining. In making such determination and in establishing rules and regulations governing petitions and the conduct of hearings and elections, the California State Mediation and Conciliation Service shall be guided by relevant federal law and administrative practice, developed under the Labor-Management Relations Act, 1947, as presently
 amended. It is declared to be in the public interest that the district shall not express any preference for one union over another.

The California State Mediation and Conciliation Service shall provide for an election to determine the question of representation and shall certify the results to the parties. Any certification of an employee organization to represent or act for the employees in any collective bargaining unit shall not be subject to challenge on the grounds that a new substantial question of representation within such collective bargaining unit exists until the lapse of one year from the date of certification or the expiration of any collective bargaining agreement, whichever is later; provided, that no collective bargaining agreement shall be construed to be a bar to representation proceedings for a period of more than two years.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 6.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102404.

(a) Exclusive representatives shall have the right to represent their bargaining unit members in employer-employee relations with the district, and employees shall have the right to be represented by their exclusive representative.

(b) This chapter is not intended to adversely affect any rights afforded to exclusive representatives or district employees under existing law, as it may be amended from time to time.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 8.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102405.

The district shall give reasonable written notice to an exclusive representative of its intent to make any change to matters within the scope of representation of the employees represented by the exclusive representative for purposes of providing the exclusive representative a reasonable amount of time to negotiate with the district regarding the proposed changes.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 10.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102406.

It is unlawful for the district to do any of the following:

(a) Impose or threaten to impose reprisals on employees, to discriminate or threaten to discriminate against employees, or otherwise to interfere with, restrain, or coerce employees because of their exercise of rights guaranteed to them by this chapter. As used in this subdivision, “employee” includes an applicant for employment or reemployment with the district.

(b) Deny employee organizations rights guaranteed to them by this chapter.

(c) Refuse or fail to meet and negotiate in good faith with an exclusive representative. Knowingly providing an exclusive representative with
 inaccurate information, whether or not it is in response to a request for information, constitutes a refusal or failure of the district to meet and negotiate in good faith with the exclusive representative.

(d) Dominate or interfere with the formation or administration of any employee organization, or contribute financial or other support to it, or in any way encourage employees to join any employee organization in preference to another.

(e) Refuse to participate in good faith in mutually agreed upon impasse procedures.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 12.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102407.

It is unlawful for an employee organization to do any of the following:

(a) Impose or threaten to impose reprisals on employees, discriminate or threaten to discriminate against employees, or otherwise interfere with, restrain, or coerce employees because of their exercise of rights guaranteed to them by this chapter.

(b) Refuse or fail to meet and negotiate in good faith with the district concerning any of the employees of which it is the exclusive representative.

(c) Refuse to participate in good faith in mutually agreed upon impasse procedures.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 14.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102408.

(a) This chapter shall not displace, or supplant, the requirements of Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 3610) of Division 4.5 of Title 1 of the Government Code, and the impasse resolution and injunctive relief procedures provided for pursuant to Sections 3612 to 3614, inclusive, of the Government Code shall remain exclusive.

(b) (1) An exclusive representative may elect to move one or more of its bargaining units to the jurisdiction of the Public Employment Relations Board for unfair practice charges. Notification by the exclusive representative of such election shall be filed with the General Counsel of the Public Employment Relations Board or their designee and served on the district pursuant to applicable regulations.
 An election by an exclusive representative for one or more of its bargaining units to be subject to the jurisdiction of the Public Employment Relations Board shall be irrevocable for that unit.

(2) The initial determination as to whether the charge of unfair practice is justified and, if so, the appropriate remedy necessary to effectuate the purposes of this chapter, is a matter within the exclusive jurisdiction of the Public Employment Relations Board, except that in an action to recover damages due to an unlawful strike, the Public Employment Relations Board shall have no authority to award strike-preparation expenses as damages, and shall have no authority to award damages for costs, expenses, or revenue losses incurred during, or as a consequence of, an unlawful strike.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 16.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102409.

(a) Any charging party, respondent, or intervenor aggrieved by a final decision or order of the Public Employment Relations Board in an unfair practice case, except a decision of that board not to issue a complaint in such a case, may petition for a writ of extraordinary relief from that decision or order.

(b) A petition for a writ of extraordinary relief shall be filed in the district court of appeal having jurisdiction over any county in which the district operates. The petition shall be filed within 30 days from the date of the issuance of the Public Employment Relations Board’s final decision or order, or order denying reconsideration, as applicable. Upon the filing of the petition, the court shall cause notice to be served upon the Public
 Employment Relations Board and thereafter shall have jurisdiction of the proceeding. The Public Employment Relations Board shall file in the court the record of the proceeding, certified by that board, within 10 days after the clerk’s notice unless that time is extended by the court for good cause shown. The court shall have jurisdiction to grant any temporary relief or restraining order it deems just and proper, and in like manner to make and enter a decree enforcing, modifying, and enforcing as modified, or setting aside in whole or in part the decision or order of the Public Employment Relations Board. The findings of the Public Employment Relations Board with respect to questions of fact, including ultimate facts, if supported by substantial evidence on the record considered as a whole, shall be conclusive. Title 1 (commencing with Section 1067) of Part 3 of the Code of Civil Procedure relating to writs shall, except where specifically superseded by this section, apply to proceedings pursuant to this
 section.

(c) If the time to petition for extraordinary relief from a Public Employment Relations Board decision or order has expired, the Public Employment Relations Board may seek enforcement of any final decision or order in a district court of appeal or superior court having jurisdiction over the county where the events giving rise to the decision or order occurred. The Public Employment Relations Board shall respond within 10 days to any inquiry from a party to the action as to why the Public Employment Relations Board has not sought court enforcement of the final decision or order. If the response does not indicate that there has been compliance with the Public Employment Relations Board’s final decision or order, the Public Employment Relations Board shall seek enforcement of the final decision or order upon the request of the party. The Public Employment Relations Board shall file in the court the record of the proceeding, certified by
 that board, and appropriate evidence disclosing the failure to comply with the decision or order. If, after hearing, the court determines that the order was issued pursuant to the procedures established by the Public Employment Relations Board and that the person or entity refuses to comply with the order, the court shall enforce the order by writ of mandamus or other proper process. The court may not review the merits of the order.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 18.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102410.

This chapter, as amended by the act adding this section, shall not be interpreted as if it were in conflict with any collective bargaining agreement and shall not be implemented to abrogate an agreement entered into before January 1, 2022, between the district and an employee organization. Sections 102405 to 102408, inclusive, shall be interpreted in a manner consistent with the Public Employment Relations Board’s interpretation of parallel provisions in other statutes it enforces.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 20.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102411.

Whenever the district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned public utility, either in proceedings by eminent domain or otherwise, the district shall assume and observe all existing pension and labor contracts. To the extent necessary for operation of facilities, all of the employees of the acquired public utility whose duties pertain to the facilities acquired shall be appointed to comparable positions in the district without examination, subject to all the rights and benefits of this part, and these employees shall be given sick leave, seniority, vacation, and pension credits in accordance with the records and labor agreements of the acquired public utility. Members and beneficiaries of any pension or retirement system or other benefits established by that public utility shall continue to have the
 rights, privileges, benefits, obligations, and status with respect to that established system. No employee of any acquired public utility shall suffer any worsening of their wages, seniority, pension, vacation, or other benefits by reason of the acquisition.

The district may extend the benefits of this section to officers or supervisory employees of the acquired public utility.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 21.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102412.

The district shall not contract with any company, person, or public agency for that company, person, or public agency to provide transit facilities or services or acquire any existing system, or part thereof, whether by purchase, lease, condemnation, or otherwise, nor shall the district dispose of or lease any transit system, or of its system, or part thereof, nor merge, consolidate, or coordinate any transit system or part thereof, unless it shall first have made adequate provision for any employees who are, or may be, displaced. The terms and conditions of the provision shall be a proper subject of collective bargaining.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 22.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102413.

Notwithstanding the provisions of the Government Code, employees of this district may authorize and, upon authorization, the district shall make deductions from wages and salaries of employees pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement with a duly designated or certified labor organization:

(a) For the payment of union dues, fees, or assessments.

(b) For the payment of contributions pursuant to any health and welfare plan or pension or retirement plan.

(c) For any purpose for which deductions may be authorized by employees of any private employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 23.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102414.

The obligation of the district to bargain in good faith with a duly designated or certified employee organization and to execute a written collective bargaining agreement with that employee organization covering the wages, hours, and working conditions of the employees represented by that employee organization in an appropriate unit, and to comply with the terms thereof, shall not be limited or restricted by any provision of law. The obligation of the district to bargain collectively shall extend to all subjects of collective bargaining that are or may be proper subjects of collective bargaining with a private employer, including retroactive provisions. The duly designated or certified employee organization shall also have the obligation to bargain in good faith.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 24.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102415.

The district shall take steps as may be necessary to obtain coverage for the district and its employees under Subchapter II of the Federal Social Security Act, as amended, and the related provisions of the Federal Insurance Contributions Act, as amended.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 25.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102416.

The district shall take steps as may be necessary to obtain coverage for the district and its employees under the workers’ compensation, unemployment compensation disability, and unemployment insurance laws of the State of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 26.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102417.

In the event an exclusive collective bargaining representative is selected pursuant to Section 102403, the provisions of Chapter 10 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code are not applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 27.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

102418.

Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 3555) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code applies to the district and its employees. Notwithstanding subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 3558.8 of the Government Code, the district is a public employer for purposes of Chapter 11.5 (commencing with Section 3555) of Division 4 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 492, Sec. 28.   (SB 598)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Retirement System [102430. - 102432.]

102430.

(a) The district may provide for a retirement system; provided, that the adoption, terms, and conditions of any retirement system covering employees of the district represented by a labor organization in accordance with this section shall be pursuant to a collective bargaining agreement between such labor organization and the district.

(b) If the district establishes a retirement board for the retirement system, board members and employees of the district may serve on the retirement board. 

(c) The district may establish trust accounts for the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 182, Sec. 6.   (AB 2015)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

102431.

The board may contract with the board of administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System and enter all or any portion of its employees under such system, provided, that no employees of the district in a bargaining unit which is represented by a labor organization shall be included in such contract except as authorized by a collective bargaining agreement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102432.

Whenever the district acquires existing facilities from a publicly or privately owned public utility, either in proceedings in eminent domain or otherwise, that has a pension plan in operation, members and beneficiaries of such pension plan shall continue to have the rights, privileges, benefits, obligations, and status with respect to such established system.

Whenever any such facilities are acquired by the district, the board shall consider and take into account the outstanding obligations and liabilities of the publicly or privately owned public utility by reason of such pension plan, and shall negotiate an allowance in the
 purchase price of such utility for the assumption of such obligations and liabilities when acquiring the facilities.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Bonds and Other Evidences of Indebtedness [102500. - 102603.]



  ARTICLE 1. Authorization and Issuance of General Obligation Bonds [102500. - 102513.]

102500.

The district may exercise its powers under this article only with respect to territory in cities and counties in which the voters have authorized the district to operate and levy a tax; the term “district” as used in this article, shall be limited to such territory for purposes of the election and the incurring of indebtedness, and for purposes of Section 102336.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102501.

Whenever the board deems it necessary for the district to incur a bonded indebtedness for the acquisition, construction, or repair of any or all improvements, works, property or facilities, authorized by this part or necessary or convenient for the carrying out of the powers of the district, or for any other purpose authorized by this part, it shall, by ordinance, adopted by a two-thirds vote of the board, so declare and call an election to be held in the district for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters thereof the proposition of incurring
 indebtedness by the issuance of bonds of the district; provided the total amount of bonds issued and outstanding pursuant to this article shall not exceed 15 percent of the assessed value of the taxable property of the district as shown by the last equalized assessment rolls of the counties of Sacramento, Placer, and Yolo. The ordinance shall state:

(a) The purposes for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, which may include all costs and estimated costs incidental to or connected with the accomplishment of those purposes, including, without limitation, engineering, inspection, legal, fiscal agents, financial consultant and other fees, bond and other reserve funds, working capital, bond interest estimated to accrue during the construction period and for a period not to exceed three years thereafter, and expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(b) The estimated cost of accomplishing those purposes.

(c) The amount of the principal of the indebtedness.

(d) The maximum term the bonds proposed to be issued shall run before maturity, which shall not exceed 50 years from the date thereof or the date of each series thereof.

(e) The maximum rate of interest to be paid, which shall not exceed 7 percent per annum.

(f) The proposition to be submitted to the voters, which may include one or more purposes.

(g) The date of the election.

(h) The manner of holding the election and the procedure for voting for or against the measure.

(i) The ordinance may also contain any other matters authorized by this part or any other law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 272, Sec. 35.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

102502.

Notice of the holding of such election shall be given by publishing, pursuant to Section 6066 of the Government Code, the ordinance calling the election in at least one newspaper published in such district. No other notice of such election need be given. Except as otherwise provided in the ordinance, the election shall be conducted as other district elections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102503.

If any proposition is defeated by the electors, the board shall not call another election on a substantially similar proposition to be held within six months after the prior election. If a petition requesting submission of such a proposition, signed by 15 percent of the district electors, as shown by the votes cast for all candidates for governor within the district at the last gubernatorial election, is filed with the board, it may call an election before the expiration of six months.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102504.

If a majority of the electors voting on the proposition vote for it, then the board may, by resolution, at such time or times as it deems proper, issue bonds of the district for the whole or any part of the amount of the indebtedness so authorized and may from time to time, by resolution, provide for the issuance of such amounts as the necessity thereof may appear, until the full amount of such bonds authorized shall have been issued. The full amount of bonds may be divided into two or more series and different dates and different dates of payment fixed for the bonds of each series. A bond need not mature on an anniversary of its date. The maximum term the bonds of any
 series shall run before maturity shall not exceed 50 years from the date of each series respectively. In such resolution or resolutions, the board shall prescribe the form of the bonds (including, without limitation, registered bonds and coupon bonds) and the form of any coupons to be attached thereto, the registration, conversion and exchange privileges, if any, pertaining thereto, and fix the time when the whole or any part of the principal shall become due and payable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102505.

The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding 8 percent per annum, payable semiannually, except that the first interest payable on the bonds or any series thereof may be for any period not exceeding one year as determined by the board. In the resolution or resolutions providing for the issuance of such bonds, the board may also provide for call and redemption of such bonds prior to maturity at such times and prices and upon such other terms as it may specify, provided that no bond shall be subject to call or redemption prior to maturity unless it contains a recital to that effect or unless a statement to that effect is printed thereon. The denomination
 or denominations of the bonds shall be stated in the resolution providing for their issuance, but shall not be less than one thousand dollars ($1,000). The principal of and interest on such bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the treasurer of the district or at such other place or places as may be designated, or at either place or places at the option of the holders of the bonds. The bonds, or such series thereof, shall be dated and numbered consecutively and shall be signed by the chairman of the board and the treasurer, countersigned by the secretary and the official seal of the district attached. The interest coupons of such bonds shall be signed by the treasurer. All such signatures, countersignatures and seal may be printed, lithographed or mechanically reproduced, except that one of such signatures or countersignatures on the bonds shall be manually affixed. If any officer whose signature or countersignature appears on bonds or coupons ceases to be such officer
 before the delivery of the bonds, his signature is as effective as if he had remained in office.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1975, Ch. 130.)
-------------------------------------------

102506.

The bonds may be sold as the board determines by resolution, but for not less than par. Before selling the bonds, or any part thereof, the board shall give notice inviting sealed bids in such manner as it may prescribe. If satisfactory bids are received, the bonds offered for sale shall be awarded to the highest responsible bidder. If no bids are received, or if the board determines that the bids received are not satisfactory as to price or responsibility of the bidders, the board may reject all bids received, if any, and either readvertise or sell the bonds at private sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102507.

Delivery of any bonds may be made at any place either inside or outside the state, and the purchase price may be received in cash or bank credits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102508.

All accrued interest and premiums received on the sale of bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of principal of and interest on the bonds and the remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the treasury to the credit of the proper improvement fund and applied exclusively to the purposes for which the debt was incurred (which purposes shall be in conformity with an approved general transit plan or element thereof then in effect); provided, however, that when such purposes have been accomplished, any moneys remaining in such improvement fund (a) shall be transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of
 principal of and interest on the bonds, or (b) shall be placed in a fund to be used for the purchase of outstanding bonds of the district from time to time in the open market at such prices and in such manner, either at public or private sale or otherwise, as the board may determine. Bonds so purchased shall be canceled immediately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102509.

After the expiration of three years after a bond election, the board may determine, by ordinance adopted by a two-thirds vote of the board, that any or all of the bonds authorized at the election remaining unsold shall not be issued or sold. When the ordinance takes effect, the authorization to issue those bonds shall become void.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 272, Sec. 36.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

102510.

Whenever the board deems that the expenditure of money for the purposes for which the bonds were authorized by the voters is impractical or unwise, it may, by ordinance adopted by a two-thirds vote of the board, so declare and call an election to be held in the district for the purpose of submitting to the qualified voters thereof the proposition of incurring indebtedness by the issuance of those bonds for some other purposes or, in the case where bonds have been sold, the proposition to use the proceeds for some other purposes. The procedure, so far as
 applicable, shall be the same as when a bond proposition is originally submitted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 272, Sec. 37.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

102511.

The board may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange of refunding bonds to redeem or retire any bonds issued by the district upon the terms, at the times and in the manner which it determines. Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to pay all, or any part, of the principal of such outstanding bonds, the interest thereon and the premiums, if any, due upon call and redemption thereof prior to maturity, and all expenses of such refunding. The provisions of this article for issuance and sale of bonds apply to the issuance and sale of such refunding bonds; except that (a) no election need be called or held for the purpose of
 authorizing the issuance of refunding bonds, and (b) when refunding bonds are to be exchanged for outstanding bonds the method of exchange shall be as determined by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102512.

The provisions of Article 4 (commencing with Section 53500), Chapter 3, Part 1, Division 2, Title 5 of the Government Code are applicable to the district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------

102513.

Any bonds which shall be issued under the provisions of this article shall be legal investment for all trust funds; for the funds of insurance companies, banks—both commercial and savings—and trust companies; and for state school funds; and whenever any money or funds may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts, or other districts within the State of California, such money or funds may be invested in the bonds issued under this part, and whenever bonds of cities, cities and counties, counties, school districts, or other districts within this state may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be
 used as security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public moneys, the said bonds issued under this part may be so used. The provisions of this article shall be in addition to all other laws relating to legal investments and shall be controlling as the latest expression of the Legislature with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1971, Ch. 1374.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Revenue Bonds [102530. - 102531.]

102530.

The district may issue bonds, payable in whole or in part from revenue of any facility or enterprise acquired or constructed or to be acquired or constructed by the district, in the manner provided by the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code, all of the provisions of which are applicable to the district, except that Article 3
 (commencing with Section 54380) of Chapter 6 of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code and the restrictions therein provided against the securing of bonds by the taxing power or the proceeds of taxation do not apply to the issuance and sale of bonds pursuant to this article and instead, the district shall authorize the issuance of those bonds by resolution of its governing board approved by a two-thirds vote of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 537, Sec. 1.   (AB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

102531.

The district is a local agency within the meaning of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 54300) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code. The term “enterprise” as used in the Revenue Bond Law of 1941 shall, for all purposes of this part, include the system or any or all transit facilities, and all additions, extensions, and improvements thereto, and all other facilities
 authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by the district. Any revenues or other income, receipts, or amounts made available to the district, including, but not limited to, the proceeds of a transactions and use tax imposed under Article 8 (commencing with Section 102350) of Chapter 5 of Division 10 or under any other provision of law, are deemed to be revenues of the enterprise for all purposes of the Revenue Bond Law of 1941. The district may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for any one or more transit facilities authorized to be acquired, constructed, or completed by the district or, in the alternative, may issue revenue bonds under the Revenue Bond Law of 1941, for the acquisition, construction, and completion of any one of those transit facilities. Nothing in this article shall prevent the district from availing itself of, or making use of, any procedure provided in this part for the issuance of bonds of any type or character for any of the transit facilities authorized
 hereunder, and all proceedings may be carried on simultaneously or, in the alternative, as the board may determine.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 537, Sec. 2.   (AB 1143)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Equipment Trust Certificates [102550. - 102554.]

102550.
